Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2250HH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 252 Section 1. Section 256.16, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . o. Beginning July 1, 2026, include 3 preparation in computer science, artificial intelligence, 4 and computational thinking that is appropriate to the grade 5 level and subject area in which the practitioner preparation 6 student will teach. A higher education institution providing 7 practitioner preparation may satisfy this requirement by 8 requiring a practitioner preparation student to complete a 9 dedicated course or module, or by integrating such preparation 10 into the existing program. 11 Sec. 2. Section 262.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 12 following new subsection: 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 39. Develop and distribute to all higher 14 education institutions in this state that provide approved 15 practitioner preparation programs guidance related to how to 16 incorporate preparation related to computer science, artificial 17 intelligence, and computational thinking into the practitioner 18 preparation program, as required under section 256.16, 19 subsection 1, paragraph âoâ . 20 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. The following applies to students 21 admitted to an approved practitioner preparation program on or 22 after July 1, 2026: 23 The section of this Act amending section 256.16. 24